Washington statutes.
RCW 19.355.030

Application of consumer protection act.

The legislature finds that the practices covered by RCW 19.355.020(1) are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2015 c 28 s 3.]